South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5163.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 16-23-20(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) It is unlawful, whether or not the person has a concealed weapon permit, for anyone to carry about the person any handgun, whether concealed or not, unless otherwise specifically authorized by law into a: (1) law enforcement, correctional, or detention facility; (2) courthouse, courtroom, or other publicly owned building, whether owned by the State, a county, a municipality, or other political subdivision, where court is held and during the time that court is in session; (3) polling place on election days; (4) office of or business meeting of the governing body of a county, public school district, municipality, or special purpose district; (5) elementary or secondary school or college athletic event not related to firearms; (6) daycare facility or preschool facility; (7) place where the carrying of firearms is prohibited by federal law; (8) church or other established religious sanctuary unless express permission is given by the appropriate church official or governing body; (9) hospital, medical clinic, doctor's office, or any other facility where medical services or procedures are performed, unless expressly authorized by the appropriate entity; (10) residence or dwelling place of another person without the express permission of the owner or person in legal control or possession of the residence or dwelling place, as appropriate; or (11) place clearly marked with a sign prohibiting the carrying of a concealable weapon on the premises in compliance with Section 23-31-235.  A person who violates a provision of this item, whether the violation is wilful or not, only may be charged with a violation of Section 16-11-620 and must not be charged with or penalized for a violation of this subsection. SECTION 2.  Section 16-23-420 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----